District of Columbia statutes.
31-5415

Stay of proceedings; reopening default judgments.

(a)

All proceedings in which the insolvent insurer is a party in any court in the District of Columbia shall be stayed 180 days from the date an order of liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation is final to permit proper legal action by the Association on any matters germane to its powers or duties.

(b)

As to judgment under any decision, order, verdict, or finding based on default, the Association may apply to have the judgment set aside by the same court that made the judgment and shall be permitted to defend against the suit on the merits.

History

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-129, § 16, 39 DCR 4036
July 23, 2014, D.C. Law 20-130, § 2(h), 61 DCR 5900

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1955.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-130 substituted “180 days” for “60 days” in (a).